Vermont, session 2025-2026, H864.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 20 V.S.A. chapter 207 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 207. PROTECTION OF PERSONALLY IDENTIFYING
INFORMATION
§ 4651. PROHIBITED DISCLOSURE OF PERSONALLY IDENTIFYING
INFORMATION
(a) As used in this section chapter:
(1) “Personally identifying information” means information concerning
a person’s sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, race, color,
religion, national origin, immigration status, age, or disability.
VT LEG #385172 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.864
2026 Page 2 of 6
(2) “Public agency” has the same meaning as in 1 V.S.A. § 317 and
shall include includes all officers, employees, agents, and independent
contractors of the public agency.
(b) A public agency shall not:
(1) collect information regarding the religious beliefs, practices, or
affiliation of any individual for the purpose of registration of an individual
based on his or her the individual’s religious beliefs, practices, or affiliations;
(2) knowingly disclose personally identifying information to any federal
agency or official for the purpose of registration of an individual based on his
or her the individual’s personally identifying information; or
(3) use public agency money, facilities, property, equipment, or
personnel to assist in creating or enforcing any federal government program for
the registration of an individual based on his or her the individual’s personally
identifying information.
(c) Any section, term, or provision of an agreement in existence on the
effective date of this section (March 28, 2017), that conflicts with subsection
(b) of this section shall be invalidated on that date to the extent of the conflict.
(d) Nothing in this section is intended to prohibit or impede any public
agency from complying with the lawful requirements of 8 U.S.C. §§ 1373 and
1644. To the extent any State or local law enforcement policy or practice
VT LEG #385172 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.864
2026 Page 3 of 6
conflicts with the lawful requirements of 8 U.S.C. §§ 1373 and 1644, said
policy or practice is, to the extent of such conflict, abolished.
(e) Nothing in this section is intended to prohibit or impede any public
agency from disclosing or exchanging aggregated information that cannot be
used to identify an individual with any other public agency or federal agency
or official.
§ 4652. AUTHORIZATION TO ENTER INTO IMMIGRATION
AGREEMENTS PURSUANT TO 8 U.S.C. § 1357(G) AND 19
U.S.C. § 1401(I)
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, only the Governor, in
consultation with the Vermont Attorney General, is authorized to enter into,
modify, or extend an agreement pursuant to 8 U.S.C. § 1357(g) or 19 U.S.C.
§ 1401(i).
(b) No public agency, as that term is defined in 1 V.S.A. § 317, or an
officer, employee, agent, or independent contractor of a public agency, shall
enter into an agreement:
(1) pursuant to section 287(g) of the Immigration and Nationality Act, 8
U.S.C. § 1357(g); or 19 U.S.C. § 1401(i) unless the Governor has authorized
the agreement as set forth in subsection (a) of this section
(2) to house individuals for alleged civil violations of federal
immigration law.
VT LEG #385172 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.864
2026 Page 4 of 6
(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit or otherwise
restrain a law enforcement officer from performing that officer’s duties in
accordance with State law.
Sec. 2. 28 V.S.A. § 101 is amended to read:
§ 101. POWERS OF THE DEPARTMENT
The Department is charged with the following powers:
(1) to establish, maintain, and administer such State correctional
facilities and programs as may be required for the custody, control,
correctional treatment, and rehabilitation of committed persons, and for the
safekeeping of such other persons as may be committed to the Department in
accordance with law;
(2) to operate diagnostic and treatment programs and such other
programs deemed desirable to treat persons committed to the Department and
to further other purposes and objectives of this title;
(3) to administer the supervision of persons placed on probation and
released on parole and to administer probation and parole services;
(4) to employ such officers, employees and agents as deemed necessary
to discharge the functions of the Department;
(5) to establish standards for the management, operation, personnel, and
program of all correctional facilities in the State;
VT LEG #385172 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.864
2026 Page 5 of 6
(6) to act in an advisory capacity in assisting law enforcement agencies,
except federal immigration authorities, and communities in the prevention of
crime and delinquency;
(7) to enforce and administer such other laws as may be vested in the
Department;
(8) to enter into agreements for assistance in support of the operation of
jails or lockups in accordance with criteria established by the Department, and
to use the jails or lockups as provided in this title, except agreements or
cooperative arrangements to assist federal immigration authorities;
(9) notwithstanding any other provision of law, the State and the
Department shall not be responsible for the expense of detaining a person in
custody except as provided in this title; and
(10) to charter, establish, and fund through grants such municipal
entities or nonprofit organizations as may be required for providing crime
prevention and restorative justice programs for offenders, victims of crime, and
the public.
Sec. 3. 28 V.S.A. § 102(b) is amended to read:
(b) The Commissioner is charged with the following powers:
* * *
VT LEG #385172 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.864
2026 Page 6 of 6
(8) To cooperate with and accept funds from the federal government or
any agency thereof, except any federal immigration authority, for the purpose
of exercising the powers and responsibilities stated in this section.
* * *
Sec. 4. TERMINATION OF AGREEMENTS
A public agency engaged in an agreement in violation of this act shall
terminate the agreement not later than 30 days after the effective date of this
act.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #385172 v.1